Utah statutes.
32A-1-809.   Transition protections.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), a manufacturer of a flavored malt
beverage may not be held liable under this title for distributing or selling a
flavored malt beverage as a beer if:
(a)  the flavored malt beverage is distributed or sold on or before September
30, 2008; and
(b)  the manufacturer when distributing or selling the flavored malt beverage
complies with the requirements of this title for distributing or selling a
beer including holding:
(i)  a brewery license under Chapter 8, Part 4, Brewery Licenses; or
(ii)  a certificate of approval issued by the department under Subsection
32A-8-101(4).
(2)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), a licensee or permittee may not be
held liable for the sale, offering, or furnishing of a flavored malt beverage
as a beer if:
(a)  the flavored malt beverage is sold, offered, or furnished on or before
September 30, 2008; and
(b)  the licensee or permittee when selling, offering, or furnishing the
flavored malt beverage complies with the requirements of this title for
selling, offering, or furnishing a beer under the license or permit held by
the licensee or permittee.
(3)  This section does not apply to liability under Chapter 14a, Alcoholic
Beverage Liability.
